es: Plumas de trigo duro integrales o semi-integrales
fr: Plumes de blé dur entières ou semi-entières

en: Durum wheat pasta with egg
de: Hartweizennudeln mit Ei
es: Pastas de trigo duro con huevo
fi: durumvehnämunapasta
fr: Pâtes de blé dur à l'œuf, Pâtes de blé dur aux œufs, Pâtes de blé dur à l'oeuf
hr: Tjestenina od durum pšenice s jajetom
it: Pasta di grano duro all'uovo
nl: Durumpastas met ei

en: Agnolotti
xx: Agnolotti
it: Agnolotti piemontesi
zh: 意大利月牙饺

en: Cannelloni
xx: Cannelloni
es: Canelones
fr: Cannelloni préparés

en: Cannelloni with vegetables
es: Cannelloni con verduras
fr: Cannelloni aux légumes
hr: Kaneloni s povrćem
it: Cannelloni con verdure
nl: Cannelloni met groenten

en: Cannelloni with cooked vegetables
es: Cannelloni con verduras cocidas
fr: Cannelloni aux légumes cuits
hr: Kaneloni s kuhanim povrćem
it: Cannelloni con verdure cotte
nl: Cannelloni met gekookte groenten

en: Bolognese Cannelloni
es: Cannelloni a la boloñesa
fr: Cannelloni à la bolognaise
hr: Kaneloni bolognese
it: Cannelloni alla bolognese

en: Beef Cannelloni
es: Cannelloni de carne de vacuno
fr: Cannelloni au boeuf
hr: Goveđi kaneloni
it: Cannelloni di manzo

en: Cannelloni with fish
es: Cannelloni de pescado
fr: Cannelloni au poisson
hr: Kaneloni s ribom
it: Cannelloni al pesce

en: Vegetarian cannelloni
es: Canelones vegetarianos
fr: Cannelloni végétariens
hr: Vegetarijanski kaneloni
it: Cannelloni vegetariani
nl: Vegetarische cannelloni

en: Cannelloni with goat cheese and spinach
es: Cannelloni con queso de cabra y espinacas
fr: Cannelloni au fromage et aux épinards
hr: Kaneloni s kozjim sirom i špinatom
it: Cannelloni con formaggio di capra e spinaci
nl: Cannelloni met geitenkaas en spinazie

en: Cannelloni with cooked vegetables and goat cheese
fr: Cannelloni aux légumes cuits et au fromage de chèvre

en: Cannelloni with ricotta and spinach
fr: Cannelloni à la ricotta et aux épinards

en: Lasagna sheets, Lasagne sheets
fr: Lasagnes à garnir
hr: Lazanje za ukrašavanje
nl: Lasagnebladen, Lasagne vellen, Lasagnevellen

en: Durum wheat plates for lasagna
bg: Кори за лазаня от твърда пшеница
es: Placas de trigo duro para lasaña
fr: Plaques de blé dur pour lasagne
hr: Tanjuri od durum pšenice za lazanje
nl: Durum tarwe lasagnabladen

en: Chickpea pasta
bg: Паста от нахут
fr: Pâtes de pois chiche
hr: Tjestenina od slanutka

en: Dry chickpea pasta
fr: Pâtes de pois chiche sèches

en: Fresh chickpea pasta
fr: Pâtes de pois chiche fraîches

en: Lentil pasta
de: Linsennudeln
es: Pasta de lentejas
fi: Linssipasta
fr: Pâtes de lentille
hr: Tjestenina od leće
it: Pasta di lenticchie
nl: Linzenpasta

en: Dry lentil pasta
fr: Pâtes de lentille sèches